Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1014.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 20, chapter 2, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 20-243, to read: START_STATUTE20-243. Gender transition and detransition procedures; coverage; reports; attorney general; definition A. Beginning January 1, 2027, any contract that is issued, delivered or renewed by a health insurer and that provides coverage for gender transition procedures may not deny coverage for gender detransition procedures. B. A physician, health care institution or other person or entity that is licensed or otherwise authorized to furnish health care services in this state and that performs gender transition procedures must agree to provide or pay for the performance of gender detransition procedures. C. A health insurer that provides coverage for gender transition services shall submit a report to the department within fifteen days after the end of the calendar month during which a claim for a detransition procedure was filed.  The report must be on a form prescribed by the department, and the form: 1. Shall include all of the following: (a) The number of insurance claims made for a gender detransition procedure. (b) The age and sex of the individual who received the gender detransition procedure. (c) If known, the date that the individual initially began a prior gender transition procedure. (d) The state and county of residence of the individual who received the gender detransition procedure. 2. May not include: (a) The name of the individual. (b) Any common identifiers of the individual, including a social security number or driver license number. (c) Any other information that is not required under this section and that would cause the individual to be identified. D. The department shall prepare an annual statistical report that compiles the information submitted pursuant to subsection C of this section, shall make the report available in a downloadable format and shall submit the report to the governor, the president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives and SHALL provide a copy of this report to the secretary of state. E. The attorney general may: 1. Investigate a potential violation of this section. 2. Seek production of documents or testimony through a civil investigative subpoena. 3. Bring an action to enforce compliance with this section. F. For the purposes of this section, "health insurer" means a disability insurer, group disability insurer, blanket disability insurer, health care services organization, hospital service corporation, medical service corporation or hospital, medical, dental and optometric service corporation.END_STATUTE Sec. 2. State agencies; expedited process; official documents; gender; delayed repeal A. Any state agency that issues licenses, certificates, permits or other official documents that require a name or sex or gender designation shall adopt an expedited procedure that allows an individual who is in the process of a gender detransition procedure to have the individual's license, certificate, permit or other official document changed to the individual's new name and sex or gender designation. B. On or before December 31, 2027, a state agency shall identify the licenses, certificates, permits or other official documents that the agency issues and identify the current process of changing a name or sex or gender designation on the license, certificate, permit or other official document and provide a report to the department of administration. C. On or before June 30, 2028, a state agency shall identify an expedited process for individuals who are in the process of a gender detransition procedure to have that individual's license, certificate, permit or other official document changed to reflect the individual's new name or sex or gender designation and provide a report to the department of administration. D. This section is repealed from and after December 31, 2028.